Illinois, session 104th, SB1605.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 52-3.80b and 27-22 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.80b)7    Sec. 2-3.80b. Agriculture education teacher grant program.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "New agriculture education program" means an agriculture 10education program approved by the State Board of Education in 11a school district that has not had an agriculture education 12program for a period of 10 years or more prior to the date of 13application for a grant under this Section.14    "Personal services cost" means the cost of a teacher 15providing 60 additional days, which shall mean 400 additional 16hours, outside the teacher's regularly scheduled teaching 17duties for the benefit of agriculture education. The 400 18additional hours shall be any activity that is to the benefit 19of agriculture education, as defined by the State Board of 20Education by rule, regardless of the time of year the activity 21occurs. 22    (b) Subject to appropriation to the State Board of 23Education, there is created an agriculture education teacher   SB1605 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10023 LNS 20094 b1grant program to fund personal services costs for agriculture 2education teachers in school districts. The grants shall be 3for the purpose of assisting school districts with paying for 4personal services costs of agriculture education teachers.5    (c) A school district may apply for a grant to fund an 6amount not to exceed 50% of the personal services cost for an 7agriculture education teacher under this Section, and the 8teacher shall receive 100% of the compensation for the 60 9additional days. However, a school district that is creating a 10new agriculture education program may apply for a grant to 11fund an amount not to exceed 100% of an agriculture teacher's 12personal services cost in the first and second year of the new 13agriculture education program and an amount not to exceed 80% 14of an agriculture teacher's personal services cost in the 15third and fourth years of the new agriculture education 16program. A school district may apply for a grant for more than 17one teacher under this Section.18    (d) A school district that applies for a grant under this 19Section or offers any extended contract for agriculture 20education shall base its personal services costs on the 21reasonably expected personal services cost for the teacher 22based on the cost of the teacher's regularly scheduled 23teaching duties.24    (e) The State Board of Education shall create a statewide 25system for an agriculture education teacher to track his or 26her additional hours completed pursuant to a grant under this   SB1605 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10023 LNS 20094 b1Section.2    (f) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules as 3necessary to implement this Section. 4(Source: P.A. 99-826, eff. 1-1-17.) 5    (105 ILCS 5/27-22)  (from Ch. 122, par. 27-22)6    Sec. 27-22. Required high school courses. 7    (a) (Blank). 8    (b) (Blank).9    (c) (Blank).10    (d) (Blank).11    (e) Through the 2023-2024 school year, as a prerequisite 12to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil entering the 139th grade must, in addition to other course requirements, 14successfully complete all of the following courses:15        (1) Four years of language arts.16        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 17    which must be English and the other of which may be English 18    or any other subject. When applicable, writing-intensive 19    courses may be counted towards the fulfillment of other 20    graduation requirements. 21        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 22    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 23    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 24    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 25    content may be offered as an integrated, applied,   SB1605 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10023 LNS 20094 b1    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 2    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 3    path.4        (3.5) For pupils entering the 9th grade in the 5    2022-2023 school year and 2023-2024 school year, one year 6    of a course that includes intensive instruction in 7    computer literacy, which may be English, social studies, 8    or any other subject and which may be counted toward the 9    fulfillment of other graduation requirements. 10        (4) Two years of science.11        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 12    year must be history of the United States or a combination 13    of history of the United States and American government 14    and, beginning with pupils entering the 9th grade in the 15    2016-2017 school year and each school year thereafter, at 16    least one semester must be civics, which shall help young 17    people acquire and learn to use the skills, knowledge, and 18    attitudes that will prepare them to be competent and 19    responsible citizens throughout their lives. Civics course 20    content shall focus on government institutions, the 21    discussion of current and controversial issues, service 22    learning, and simulations of the democratic process. 23    School districts may utilize private funding available for 24    the purposes of offering civics education. Beginning with 25    pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school 26    year, one semester, or part of one semester, may include a   SB1605 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10023 LNS 20094 b1    financial literacy course.2        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 3    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 4    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 5    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 6    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 7    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 8    requirement under this subdivision (6). 9    (e-5) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, as a 10prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 11entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 12requirements, successfully complete all of the following 13courses: 14        (1) Four years of language arts.15        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 16    which must be English and the other of which may be English 17    or any other subject. If applicable, writing-intensive 18    courses may be counted toward the fulfillment of other 19    graduation requirements.20        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 21    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 22    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 23    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 24    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 25    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 26    course that prepares a student for a career readiness   SB1605 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10023 LNS 20094 b1    path.2        (3.5) One year of a course that includes intensive 3    instruction in computer literacy, which may be English, 4    social studies, or any other subject and which may be 5    counted toward the fulfillment of other graduation 6    requirements. 7        (4) Two years of laboratory science.8        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 9    year must be history of the United States or a combination 10    of history of the United States and American government 11    and at least one semester must be civics, which shall help 12    young people acquire and learn to use the skills, 13    knowledge, and attitudes that will prepare them to be 14    competent and responsible citizens throughout their lives. 15    Civics course content shall focus on government 16    institutions, the discussion of current and controversial 17    issues, service learning, and simulations of the 18    democratic process. School districts may utilize private 19    funding available for the purposes of offering civics 20    education. One semester, or part of one semester, may 21    include a financial literacy course.22        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 23    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 24    American Sign Language, (D) career and technical 25    vocational education, or (E) forensic speech (speech and 26    debate). A forensic speech course used to satisfy the   SB1605 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10023 LNS 20094 b1    course requirement under subdivision (1) may not be used 2    to satisfy the course requirement under this subdivision 3    (6). 4    (e-10) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, as a 5prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 6entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 7requirements, successfully complete 2 years of foreign 8language courses, which may include American Sign Language. A 9pupil may choose a third year of foreign language to satisfy 10the requirement under subdivision (6) of subsection (e-5). 11    (f) The State Board of Education shall develop and inform 12school districts of standards for writing-intensive 13coursework. 14    (f-5) If a school district offers an Advanced Placement 15computer science course to high school students, then the 16school board must designate that course as equivalent to a 17high school mathematics course and must denote on the 18student's transcript that the Advanced Placement computer 19science course qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative 20course for students in accordance with subdivision (3) of 21subsection (e) of this Section. 22    (g) Public Act 83-1082 does not apply to pupils entering 23the 9th grade in 1983-1984 school year and prior school years 24or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 25determined by an individualized education program. 26    Public Act 94-676 does not apply to pupils entering the   SB1605 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10023 LNS 20094 b19th grade in the 2004-2005 school year or a prior school year 2or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 3determined by an individualized education program. 4    Subdivision (3.5) of subsection (e) does not apply to 5pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school year or a 6prior school year or to students with disabilities whose 7course of study is determined by an individualized education 8program. 9    Subsection (e-5) does not apply to pupils entering the 9th 10grade in the 2023-2024 school year or a prior school year or to 11students with disabilities whose course of study is determined 12by an individualized education program. Subsection (e-10) does 13not apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2027-2028 14school year or a prior school year or to students with 15disabilities whose course of study is determined by an 16individualized education program. 17    (h) The provisions of this Section are subject to the 18provisions of Sections 14A-32 and 27-22.05 of this Code and 19the Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness Act. 20    (i) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to modify 21the requirements of this Section for any students enrolled in 22grades 9 through 12 if the Governor has declared a disaster due 23to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 24Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 25(Source: P.A. 102-366, eff. 8-13-21; 102-551, eff. 1-1-22; 26102-864, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-743, eff.   SB1605 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10023 LNS 20094 b18-2-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.